Arkansas, session 2025, SB572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Public School Access
and Transparency Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The purpose of this act is to amend the Freedom of Information Act of
1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., to:
(1) Prevent the abuse of copyright claims by public records
custodians for public schools; and
(2) Guarantee access to school learning materials, thus ensuring
transparency and accountability in public education in the state.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 25-19-103(7), concerning the definition of
"public records" under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is amended to
read as follows:
(7)(A) “Public records” means writings, recorded sounds, films,
*TNL375*
04-01-2025 17:40:19 TNL375

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB572
tapes, electronic or computer-based information, or data compilations in any
medium required by law to be kept or otherwise kept and that constitute a
record of the performance or lack of performance of official functions that
are or should be carried out by a public official or employee, a governmental
agency, or any other agency or improvement district that is wholly or
partially supported by public funds or expending public funds. All records
maintained in public offices or by public employees within the scope of their
employment shall be presumed to be public records, including without
limitation learning materials used in or maintained by a public school or
public school district.
(B) “Public records” does not mean software acquired by
purchase, lease, or license;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 25-19-103, concerning definitions under the
Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(10)(A) "Learning materials" means curricula, syllabi, lesson
plans, instructional materials, assignments, presentations, books, articles,
video recordings, audio recordings, digital resources, or other resources
that are maintained and used by public schools for classroom instruction,
regardless of format or medium.
(B) "Learning materials" does not include tests or other
student assessments used by public schools or public school districts.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 25-19-105, concerning the examination and
copying of public records under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(i)(1) Access to learning materials, as defined in § 25-19-103, shall
not be denied to any resident on the grounds that disclosure, inspection, or
copying of the learning materials would constitute an infringement of
copyright under federal law.
(2) A custodian of learning materials shall not enter into an
agreement or contract that purports to restrict public access to learning
materials based on intellectual property rights, or any similar legal theory.
(3)(A) A person who receives access to copyrighted learning
materials under this section shall not publish, distribute, or utilize the
04-01-2025 17:40:19 TNL375

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB572
copyrighted learning materials for any purpose other than public inspection.
(B) Any copies of copyrighted learning materials under
this section shall not exceed any amounts permissible under fair use
provisions of the copyright laws of the United States under 17 U.S.C. § 101
et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(4)(A) Consistent with subsection (g) of this section, access
for public inspection shall not be denied to digital learning materials,
including without limitation subscription-based services or other programs
that can be accessed with personal electronic devices.
(B) To the extent that copying digital learning materials
under subdivision (i)(4)(A) of this section is impractical, a resident
requesting to copy the digital learning materials shall be provided the
opportunity to physically inspect the digital learning materials during
normal business hours.
(5)(A) Subject to subdivision (i)(2) of this section, access to
learning materials, including without limitation the physical inspection of
digital learning materials, for public inspection shall not be conditioned
upon a resident seeking access to the learning materials being required to
enter into any form of nondisclosure agreement or waiver of rights under this
chapter.
(B) For purposes of this section, "nondisclosure
agreement" means a confidentiality agreement or contract provision that
prohibits the disclosure of information by a party to the contract to a
third-party.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. Severability. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this
end, the provisions of this act are severable.

/s/J. Dotson




04-01-2025 17:40:19 TNL375